Washington statutes.
RCW 39.42.020

Evidences of indebtedness—Issuance—Signature.

Bonds, notes or other evidences of indebtedness shall be issued by the state finance committee. They may be issued at one time or in a series from time to time. The maturity date of each series shall be determined by the state finance committee, but in no case shall any bonds mature later than thirty years from the date of issue. All evidences of indebtedness shall be signed in the name of the state by the governor and the treasurer. The facsimile signature of said officials is authorized and said evidences of indebtedness may be issued notwithstanding that any of the officials signing them or whose facsimile signatures appear on such evidences of indebtedness has ceased to hold office at the time of issue or at the time of delivery to the purchaser.

[ 1971 ex.s. c 184 s 2.]